New York, session 2025-2026, A9285.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "mental health integration for networked data (MIND) act". 3 § 2. Legislative findings and intent. The legislature finds that the 4 effective treatment and coordination of mental health services across 5 the state of New York requires a centralized, secure, and standardized 6 framework for the collection, integration, and sharing of mental health 7 data. The office of mental health currently administers data systems, 8 including the psychiatric services and clinical knowledge enhancement 9 system (PSYCKES), which facilitate such integration and support improved 10 outcomes, accountability, and provider coordination. It is the intent of 11 the legislature to expand and standardize the use of such platforms 12 across counties and local mental health systems statewide. 13 § 3. The mental hygiene law is amended by adding a new section 5.10 to 14 read as follows: 15 § 5.10 Statewide mental health data integration and reporting framework. 16 (a) The office of mental health shall establish and maintain a 17 centralized mental health data reporting and integration platform to be 18 utilized by all state-operated and county-administered mental health 19 programs, as well as all providers licensed or funded by the office of 20 mental health for the provision of mental health services. Such system 21 shall include, but not be limited to, the functionality currently 22 provided by the psychiatric services and clinical knowledge enhancement EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13634-02-6 A. 9285--A 2 1 system (PSYCKES), or its successor system as designated by the commis- 2 sioner. 3 (b) All covered entities shall report mental health-related incidents, 4 treatment utilization, and support services in accordance with standards 5 and protocols developed by the office of mental health. The office shall 6 promulgate such standards through regulation within one hundred eighty 7 days of the effective date of this section. 8 (c) Subject to appropriation, funds shall be made available to coun- 9 ties, municipalities, and eligible provider organizations for costs 10 associated with compliance with this section, including, but not limited 11 to: 12 (1) administrative expenses; 13 (2) staffing and personnel support; 14 (3) system upgrades and technological integration; 15 (4) training and education for provider staff and administrators on 16 system use, data reporting standards, and compliance procedures; 17 (5) training on the health insurance portability and accountability 18 act (HIPAA), including privacy, consent, and data-sharing protocols; and 19 (6) procedures to ensure informed consent from individuals whose data 20 will be entered into or accessed through the centralized system. 21 (d) The office of mental health shall administer such funding pursuant 22 to guidelines it shall develop, which may include grant application 23 procedures, eligibility criteria, and reporting requirements. 24 (e) The office of mental health shall ensure that all participating 25 entities demonstrate compliance with federal and state data privacy and 26 confidentiality laws, including HIPAA, as a condition of receiving fund- 27 ing pursuant to this section. 28 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however that 29 subdivision (b) of section 5.10 of the mental hygiene law as added by 30 section three of this act shall take effect one hundred eighty days 31 after such effective date.